Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-709
Certified registered nurse anesthetist; license; renewal.

To renew a license to practice as a certified registered nurse anesthetist, the applicant shall have current certification by the Council on Certification of Nurse Anesthetists.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 73;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 42;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 46;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 157;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 61;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 62;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 106;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 80;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1735;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 239.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.